Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.470

Earned disability allowance—Cancellation of allowance—Reentry—Receipt of service credit while disabled—Conditions—Disposition upon death of recipient—Disabled in the line of duty—Total disability—Reimbursement for certain payments—Disabled while providing emergency management services.

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-three, except under subsection (7) of this section.

(2) Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position held by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the department determines that the member is able to return to service, the member is entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(3) Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to receive service credit subject to the following:

(a) No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b) No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or is separated without leave of absence.

(c) Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for the period of the service credited.

(d) Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e) State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.067.

(f) Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would have received had the disability not occurred.

(g) The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h) Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her legal representative.

(b) If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

(5) Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for service, he or she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions at the time of retirement over all payments made on his or her behalf under this chapter.

(6) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty, and who ceases to be an employee of an employer except by service or disability retirement, may request a refund of one hundred fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions. Any accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent. A person in receipt of this benefit is a retiree.

(7) A member who becomes disabled in the line of duty shall be entitled to receive a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five.

(8) A member who became disabled in the line of duty before January 1, 2001, and is receiving an allowance under RCW 41.26.430 or subsection (1) of this section shall be entitled to receive a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five, and shall have the allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-three. An additional benefit shall not result in a total monthly benefit greater than that provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(9) A member who is totally disabled in the line of duty is entitled to receive a retirement allowance equal to seventy percent of the member's final average salary. The allowance provided under this subsection shall be offset by:

(a) Temporary disability wage-replacement benefits or permanent total disability benefits provided to the member under Title 51 RCW; and

(b) Federal social security disability benefits, if any;

so that such an allowance does not result in the member receiving combined benefits that exceed one hundred percent of the member's final average salary. However, the offsets shall not in any case reduce the allowance provided under this subsection below the member's accrued retirement allowance.

A member is considered totally disabled if he or she is unable to perform any substantial gainful activity due to a physical or mental condition that may be expected to result in death or that has lasted or is expected to last at least twelve months. Substantial gainful activity is defined as average earnings in excess of eight hundred sixty dollars a month in 2006 adjusted annually as determined by the director based on federal social security disability standards. The department may require a person in receipt of an allowance under this subsection to provide any financial records that are necessary to determine continued eligibility for such an allowance. A person in receipt of an allowance under this subsection whose earnings exceed the threshold for substantial gainful activity shall have their benefit converted to a line-of-duty disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Any person in receipt of an allowance under the provisions of this section is subject to comprehensive medical examinations as may be required by the department under subsection (2) of this section in order to determine continued eligibility for such an allowance.

(10)(a) In addition to the retirement allowance provided in subsection (9) of this section, the retirement allowance of a member who is totally disabled in the line of duty shall include reimbursement for any payments made by the member after June 10, 2010, for premiums on employer-provided medical insurance, insurance authorized by the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985 (COBRA), medicare part A (hospital insurance), and medicare part B (medical insurance). A member who is entitled to medicare must enroll and maintain enrollment in both medicare part A and medicare part B in order to remain eligible for the reimbursement provided in this subsection. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal the benefits provided in this subsection in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive any distribution not granted prior to that time.

(b) The retirement allowance of a member who is not eligible for reimbursement provided in (a) of this subsection shall include reimbursement for any payments made after June 30, 2013, for premiums on other medical insurance. However, in no instance shall the reimbursement exceed the amount reimbursed for premiums authorized by the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985 (COBRA).

(11) A member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard, military reserves, federal emergency management agency, or national disaster medical system of the United States department of health and human services and who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the director while performing service in response to a disaster, major emergency, special event, federal exercise, or official training on or after March 22, 2014, shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 except such allowance is not subject to an actuarial reduction for early retirement as provided in RCW 41.26.430. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.26.420, except that the member shall be entitled to a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five.

(12) A member who is in receipt of a nonduty disability benefit under subsection (1) of this section, for a disabling condition that was not considered an occupational disease by the department of labor and industries at the time the member retired but is now considered an occupational disease in accordance with the definition of posttraumatic stress disorder in RCW 51.08.165, may file a new application with the department for a determination of their eligibility for an in the line of duty disability retirement benefit under subsections (7) and (9) of this section with the current occupational disease eligibility applied to their application. If the department finds that the member is eligible for an in the line of duty disability retirement the benefit must be paid retroactive to the disabling condition being made eligible as an occupational disease under RCW 51.08.165.

[ 2024 c 304 s 401; 2016 c 115 s 3; 2013 c 287 s 2; 2010 c 259 s 2. Prior: 2009 c 523 s 6; 2009 c 95 s 1; 2006 c 39 s 1; 2005 c 451 s 1; 2004 c 4 s 1; 2001 c 261 s 2; 2000 c 247 s 1104; 1999 c 135 s 1; 1995 c 144 s 18; 1993 c 517 s 4; 1990 c 249 s 19; prior: 1989 c 191 s 1; 1989 c 88 s 1; 1982 c 12 s 2; 1981 c 294 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 8.]

NOTES:

Short title—2013 c 287: "This act may be known as the Wynn Loiland act." [ 2013 c 287 s 1.]

Short title—2010 c 259: "This act may be known as the Jason McKissack act." [ 2010 c 259 s 1.]

Effective date—2006 c 39: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 14, 2006]." [ 2006 c 39 s 3.]

Effective date—2005 c 451: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 13, 2005]." [ 2005 c 451 s 2.]

Application—2004 c 4 s 1: "This act applies to all members, subject to section 1 of this act, who become or became disabled in the line of duty on or after January 1, 2001." [ 2004 c 4 s 2.]

Effective date—2001 c 261 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 261 s 5.]

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Application—1999 c 135 s 1: "Section 1 of this act applies to any member who received a disability retirement allowance on or after February 1, 1990." [ 1999 c 135 s 2.]

Purpose—1993 c 517: See note following RCW 41.26.420.

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters: RCW 41.04.500 through 41.04.550.